Ohio, session 136, HB658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4503.728 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4503.728. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle and issuance of specialty license plates for supporting housing and emergency living transitions, empowerment, and recovery, also known as "SHELTER" license plates. An application made under this section may be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the completed application and compliance by the applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and a set of "SHELTER" license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed on the license plates, "SHELTER" license plates shall be inscribed with identifying words or markings that are designed by the director of development and that are approved by the registrar. "SHELTER" license plates shall display county identification stickers that identify the county of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. (B) "SHELTER" license plates and a validation sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of a contribution as provided in division (C)(1) of this section and upon payment of the regular license tax as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, a bureau of motor vehicles administrative fee of ten dollars, and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles. (C)(1) For each application for registration and registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of thirty dollars. The registrar shall transmit this contribution into the state treasury to the credit of the SHELTER license plate contribution fund created in division (D) of this section. (2) The registrar shall deposit the bureau administrative fee of ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau for additional services required in the issuing of "SHELTER" license plates, into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (D) There is hereby created in the state treasury the SHELTER license plate contribution fund. The fund shall consist of money deposited into it by the registrar under this section. The director of development or the director's designee shall use money in the fund to issue grants to shelters, emergency housing providers, or nonprofits that help individuals experiencing homelessness. Such shelters, providers, or nonprofits shall use the grants to provide services to such individuals. The director shall approve the shelters, providers, and nonprofits that receive such grants and the amounts paid to each such entity.